District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.25a

Permitting authority to install meters.

If a department, independent establishment, or agency of the United States which uses water and water services from the District of Columbia water supply system has not installed a suitable meter at each point of Federal connection to the system to control and record the use of water through each such connection (as required under § 34-2401.25(a)) as of the expiration of the 60-day period which begins on December 21, 2001:

(1)

The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority shall install such a meter or meters (and incidental vaults, valves, piping and recording devices, and such other equipment as the Authority deems necessary) not later than 60 days after the expiration of such period; and

(2)

The department, independent establishment, or agency shall pay the Authority promptly (but in no case later than 30 days after the Authority submits a bill) for the costs incurred in installing the meter and equipment.

History

Dec. 21, 2001, 115 Stat. 943, Pub. L. 107-96, par. 52(b)(2)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-2401.25.

Effective Dates

Pub. L. 107-96, 115 Stat. 944, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 2002, provided in part:
“This section and the amendments made by this section shall apply with respect to fiscal year 2002 and each succeeding fiscal year.”